Nebraska, session 109, LB372.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB372 LB372
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 75-109, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
75-109 Except as provided in the Agricultural Suppliers Lease
Protection Act and sections 86-124 and 86-143, the commission shall
regulate and exercise general control as provided by law over all common
and contract carriers engaged in the transportation of freight or
passengers for hire or furnishing telecommunications services for hire in
Nebraska intrastate commerce.
Sec. 2. Original section 75-109, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
Sec. 3. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
2-3813, 2-3814, 2-5501, 2-5502, 2-5503, 2-5504, 2-5505, 2-5506, 2-5507,
2-5508, and 81-2,181, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-2-